New Jersey, session 221, S3392.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 35 of P.L.2023, c.30 (C.19:44A-6a) is amended to read as follows: 35.  Any enforcement action brought by the Election Law Enforcement Commission for any violations of P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-1 et seq.) shall be subject to a statute of limitations of [two] four years following the [occurrence of] date of the election for which the alleged violation occurred. The statute of limitations provided in this section shall apply [retroactively] to any alleged violations occurring [prior to] following the effective date of this act, [P.L.2023, c.30 (C.19:44A-20.10a et al.)] P.L.   , c.   (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2023, c.30, s.35) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.